Florida, session 2026, HB709.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 943.0411, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
943.0411 Internet Crimes Against Children Online Sting
Operations Grant Program for local law enforcement affiliates
agencies to protect children.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb709-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 709 2026
(a) "Affiliate" means a local law enforcement agency in
this state which has a current memorandum of understanding with
an established Internet crimes against children task force or
which has been designated by the department as being in good
standing.
(b) "Good standing" means a local law enforcement agency
in this state that receives CyberTips from one of the task
forces and follows Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force
Program standards in its investigation of Internet crimes
against children.
(c) "Internet crimes against children task force" means an
Internet crimes against children task force located in this
state which is recognized by the United States Department of
Justice.
(2) There is created within the department the Internet
Crimes Against Children Online Sting Operations Grant Program to
award grants to local law enforcement affiliates agencies to
support their work to combat online child exploitation and
creation of sting operations to target individuals online
preying upon children or attempting to do so.
(3)(2) The department shall annually award to local law
enforcement affiliates agencies any funds specifically
appropriated for the grant program to cover expenses related to
their work to combat Internet crimes against children. The funds
may be awarded to cover overtime pay, travel, investigative or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb709-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 709 2026
digital forensics training, hardware, or computers, electronics,
software, and other related necessary supplies. Grants must be
provided to local law enforcement agencies if funds are
appropriated for that purpose by law. The total amount of grants
awarded may not exceed funding appropriated for the grant
program.
(4)(3) The department may establish criteria and set
specific time periods for the acceptance of applications and for
the selection process for awarding grant funds.
Section 2. Section 943.0421, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
943.0421 Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force
Funding Program.—
(1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Florida
Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Funding Program
Act."
(2) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.—The Legislature finds that the
Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Program administered
by the United States Department of Justice helps state and local
law enforcement agencies develop an effective response to
technology-facilitated child sexual exploitation and Internet
crimes against children. This help encompasses forensic and
investigative components, training and technical assistance,
victim services, and community education. The program is a
national network of 61 coordinated task forces representing over
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb709-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 709 2026
5,400 federal, state, and local law enforcement and
prosecutorial agencies. The Legislature intends to create an
account dedicated to combating Internet crimes against children,
promoting education on Internet safety to minors and to the
public, and rescuing child victims from abuse and exploitation.
(3) DEFINITION.—The term "task force" means an Internet
Crimes Against Children Task Force program located in this state
which is recognized by the United States Department of Justice.
(4) ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM.—The Internet Crimes Against
Children Task Force Funding Program is created within the
department to provide a stable funding source for the task
forces.
(a) Funding for the program shall consist of moneys
appropriated by the Legislature. Program funds may be used only
to support the administration and activities of law enforcement
agencies in their efforts to combat Internet crimes against
children, including the funding of personnel, overtime pay,
training, travel, and technology purchases.
(b) Moneys appropriated to the program must be distributed
in the following amounts:
1. Eighty percent divided equally among the task forces;
and
2. Twenty percent to the department to support its efforts
in combating Internet crimes against children.
100 (5) RULEMAKING.—The department may adopt rules to
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb709-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 709 2026
101 implement and administer this section.
102 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb709-01-c1